District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0546.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this act
may be cited as the “E911 Modernization Amendment Act of 2025.”
Sec. 2. The Emergency and Non-Emergency Number Telephone Calling Systems Fund Act
of 2000, effective October 19, 2000 (D.C. Law 13-172; D.C. Official Code § 34-1801 et seq.), is
amended as follows:
(a) Section 602 (D.C. Official Code § 34-1801) is amended as follows:
(1) A new paragraph (1A) is added to read as follows:
“(1A) “Access line” means a wireline, Voice over Internet Protocol (“VoIP”) line,
wireless telephone number, trunk, or other communication path that can initiate a 911 call.
(2) A new paragraph (2B) is added to read as follows:

“(2B) “Family or shared plan” means a telecommunications service plan offered by a
provider under a single customer account that includes multiple individual access lines or mobile
numbers, whether the plan is marketed as a family plan, shared plan, multi-line plan, group plan, or
any similar offering that allows two or more users to share voice, text, data, or billing features. Each
individual access line or mobile number capable of accessing or connecting with the District’s 911
system shall be considered a separate line for purpose of assessing the tax or fee under this chapter.”
(3) Paragraph (5) is amended to read as follows:
“(5) “Local exchange service” means a telecommunications service provided within an
exchange area, including VoIP, wireless services, interconnected Internet Protocol (“IP”)-based
services, and any voice-capable telecommunications service that enables connection to 911.”
(4) A new paragraph (5A) is added to read as follows:
“(5A) “Next Generation 911” means an IP-based, secure, and resilient emergency
communications system designed to enhance and modernize the District’s 911 system, including
enabling the transmission of voice, text, data, video, and geolocation information between the public
and public safety answering points and among emergency response agencies.”.
(5) Paragraph (6C) is amended to read as follows:
“(6C) “Provider” means a person that provides wireline, wireless, VoIP, or prepaid
telecommunications services to consumers within the District.”.
(b) Subsection 603(c) (D.C. Official Code § 34-1802(c)) is amended to read as follows:
“(c) Money in the Fund shall be used for the following purposes as it relates to the District’s
911 system:
“(1) Planning, implementing, operating, maintaining, and modernizing the District’s
911 system, including the next generation 911 infrastructure;


“(2) Internet Protocol-based emergency services networks;
“(3) Call-handling equipment;
“(4) Geolocation and geographic information systems;
“(5) Cybersecurity;
“(6) Text and multimedia communications capabilities;
“(7) Personnel training;
“(8) Developing, maintaining, and implementing a Districtwide next generation 911
implementation and readiness plan to ensure that OUC’s operations, infrastructure, and systems meet
national next generation 911standards and operational requirements; and
“(9) Necessary costs associated with personnel, technology hardware, software and
software maintenance, contractual services, public outreach, training, supplies, and equipment
required to support the District’s 911 system.”.
(c) Section 604(a) (D.C. Official Code § 34-1803(a)) is amended to read as follows:
“(a)(1) There is imposed upon all providers that enable end users to initiate a 911 call or
communication to the District’s 911 system, a $1.00 tax calculated based on each individual line,
voice channel, or equivalent sold or leased in the District of Columbia.
“(a)(2) For interconnected VoIP service, as defined by 47 C.F.R. § 9.3, $1.00 for each line,
trunk, or path that can access to, connect with, or interface with 911 service based on primary place of
use.
“(2) The PBX fee per station shall be converted into a per-trunk fee based on a ratio of 15 PBX
stations to one PBX trunk.”.
(b) Section 604b (D.C. Official Code § 34-1803.02) is amended as follows:


“(A) Subsection (a)(1) is amended by striking the phrase “A prepaid wireless E911
charge of 2.0% of the sales price per retail transaction occurring in the District shall be collected by
the seller from the consumer, and remitted to the District.” and inserting the phrase “A prepaid
wireless E911 charge of 5.0% of the sales price per retail transaction occurring in the District shall be
collected by the seller from the consumer, and remitted to the District.” in its place.
“(B) Subsection (f) is repealed.
(c) Section 605a (D.C. Official Code § 34-1804) is amended to read as follows:
“Sec. 605a Reporting.
“(a) (1) By February 1, 2027, and annually thereafter by December 31, the Mayor shall submit
to the Council a report on the Fund, that shall include the following information:
“(A) The total revenue collected during the preceding fiscal year, disaggregated
by wireline, wireless, Voice over Internet Protocol (“VoIP”), and prepaid sources;
“(B) The Fund balance at the beginning and end of the fiscal year;
“(C) An itemized list of all expenditures from the Fund, including capital,
operational, and personnel costs;
“(D) A description of the status of all ongoing and planned next generation 911
projects or system upgrades, including implementation timelines, key milestones, and anticipated
costs;
“(E) An assessment of the sufficiency of surcharge revenue to meet the
District’s operational and modernization needs, including any recommended adjustments to surcharge
rates; and


100 “(F) A summary of performance indicators for the Office of Unified
101 Communications, including call-handling metrics, technology performance indicators, and next
102 generation 911 readiness benchmarks.
103 “(2) By April 1, 2027, and annually thereafter by April 1, the Chief Financial Officer
104 shall conduct an audit and submit an audit report to the Mayor and the Council detailing all revenues
105 deposited into, and expenditures made from, the Fund, which shall include:
106 “(A) Verification of the surcharge amounts collected and remitted by providers
107 and sellers;
108 “(B) Evaluation of internal controls to prevent misuse, diversion, or improper
109 expenditure of funds;
110 “(C) Assessment of compliance with the authorized uses described in section
111 603(c);
112 “(D) Review of procurement practices associated with next generation 911 and
113 911 system upgrades; and
114 “(E) Identification of any material weaknesses, irregularities, or deficiencies,
115 and recommendations for corrective action.
116 “(b) Beginning October 1, 2029, and every 3 years thereafter, the Mayor shall conduct a
117 comprehensive review of the tax imposed by this act. By December 31, 2029, and by December 31
118 each subsequent review year, the Mayor shall submit to the Council a written recommendation
119 indicating whether the rates should be adjusted based on the following factors:
120 “(1) The Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers for the Washington-
121 Arlington-Alexandria Metropolitan Area, including the cumulative percentage change
122 in the index since the prior rate adjustment, which shall serve as the minimum


123 recommended increase to the surcharge unless the Mayor determines that a different
124 adjustment is warranted based on operational need or fiscal impact;
125 “(2) Call volume trends and overall system demand;
126 “(3) Costs associated with next generation 911 upgrades and lifecycle replacements;
127 “(4) Personnel and training requirements;
128 “(5) Long-term capital planning for emergency communications infrastructure; and
129 “(6) Availability of federal grants or matching fund requirements.”.
130 Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
131 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal impact
132 statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
133 October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
134 Sec. 4. Effective date.
135 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
136 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review as
137 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24,
138 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).